apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
	<pardef n="fal/ar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
     
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
     
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asti</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esti</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ó</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>astis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>estis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aron</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aba</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abes</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aba</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ábamos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ábemos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abais</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>abeis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aben</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ara</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>are</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aras</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ares</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ara</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>are</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áramos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>áremos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arais</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>areis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aran</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aren</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>as</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>an</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aré</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arás</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ará</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aremos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aréis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arán</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aría</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríes</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aría</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríamos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aríemos</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríais</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aríeis</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aríen</l> 
          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l> 

    <e><i>acab</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>acobard</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>acut</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>afuñ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>alarm</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>allamp</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>amaliñ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>amortigañ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aparr</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>arim</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>arrat</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>asesin</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>atuñ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>bocay</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>call</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>cap</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>cimbl</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>compaxin</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>cuch</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>desafit</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>desengañ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>duld</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enanch</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enganch</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>ensay</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esblanquiñ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>escargat</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esfaraguy</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esgargay</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esmordigañ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esquit</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>factur</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>figur</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>fum</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>garll</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>gorgut</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>imaxin</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>llabr</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>llevant</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>mas</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>mir</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>ocup</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>pap</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>perfum</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>plizcañ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>puñ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>reclam</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>remuñ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>retir</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>runf</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>socolliñ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>taragañ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>tosquil</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>tresman</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>xibl</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>acab</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>acut</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>alarm</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>amaliñ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>aparr</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>arrat</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>atuñ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>call</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>cimbl</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>cuch</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>desengañ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>enanch</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>ensay</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>escargat</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esgargay</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>esquit</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>figur</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>garll</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>imaxin</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>llevant</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>mir</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>pap</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>plizcañ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>reclam</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>retir</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>socolliñ</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>tosquil</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i>us</i><par n="fal/ar__vblex"/></e>
